Massachusetts, session 194th, S2803.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Executive Office of
Energy and Environmental Affairs shall provide authorization that cranberry water use
registrations and permits issued pursuant to M.G.L. Chapter 21G can be used for mitigation by
other permitted or registered users subject to approval of the Department of Environmental
Protection pursuant to regulations, procedures and protocols established by the department.
of 1